Illinois, session 104th, SB1194.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act is 5amended by adding Section 16.10 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 620/16.10 new)7    Sec. 16.10. Single-use plastic disposable foodware.8    (a) In this Section:9    "Compostable material" means products or materials that 10will completely break down into organic matter within 180 days 11and will be consumed by microorganisms present in the compost 12at the same rate as natural materials.13    "Department" means the Department of Public Health.14    "Dine-in" means food and beverages that are intended to be 15consumed on the premises of a full-service restaurant or 16quick-service restaurant.17    "Disposable cup" means a beverage cup designed for a 18single use to serve beverages, including, but not limited to, 19water, cold drinks, hot drinks, and alcoholic beverages.20    "Disposable foodware" means containers, bowls, plates, 21trays, cartons, cups, lids, forks, spoons, knives, napkins, 22and other items that are designed for one-time use for 23beverages, prepared food, or leftovers from meals prepared by   SB1194- 2 -LRB104 06167 BDA 16201 b1a food dispensing establishment. "Disposable foodware" does 2not include items composed entirely of aluminum.3    "Expanded polystyrene" means blown polystyrene and 4expanded and extruded foams that are thermoplastic 5petrochemical materials utilizing a styrene monomer and 6processed by multiple techniques, including, but not limited 7to, fusion of polymer spheres, expanded bead polystyrene, 8injection molding, foam molding, extrusion-blow molding, and 9extruded foam polystyrene.10    "Expanded polystyrene food service products" means food 11containers, plates, hot and cold beverage cups, meat and 12vegetable trays, egg cartons, and other products made of 13expanded polystyrene and used for selling or providing food.14    "Full-service restaurant" means a food dispensing 15establishment with the primary business purpose of serving 16food, where food may be consumed on the premises and where :17        (1) A consumer is escorted or assigned to an assigned 18    eating area. The employee may choose the assigned eating 19    area or may seat the consumer according to the consumer's 20    need for accommodation or other request.21        (2) A consumer's food and beverage orders are taken 22    after the consumer has been seated at the assigned seating 23    area.24        (3) Food and beverage orders are delivered directly to 25    the consumer.26        (4) Any requested items associated with a consumer's   SB1194- 3 -LRB104 06167 BDA 16201 b1    food or beverage order are brought to the consumer.2        (5) The check is delivered directly to the consumer at 3    the assigned eating area.4    "Prepared food" means foods or beverages that are prepared 5and served by a food dispensing establishment on the licensed 6premises by cooking, chopping, slicing, mixing, freezing, 7squeezing, or other processing and which require no further 8preparation for human consumption. "Prepared food" does not 9include raw, uncooked whole fruits or vegetables that are not 10chopped, squeezed, or mixed, or raw uncooked meat products.11    "Quick-service restaurant" means a food dispensing 12establishment that has minimal table service and makes food 13available upon order and pick up from a vehicle.14    "Reusable foodware" means plates, bowls, cups, trays, 15glasses, stirrers, condiment cups, utensils, and other 16foodware that is:17        (1) manufactured from durable materials;18        (2) specifically designed and manufactured to be 19    washed, sanitized, and used repeatedly over an extended 20    period of time; and21        (3) safe for washing and sanitizing according to 22    applicable regulations.23    "Single-use plastic disposable foodware" means any 24disposable foodware item, including, but not limited to, all 25of the following: stirrers, napkins, and utensils; condiment 26cups and packets; cup sleeves, tops, lids, and spill plugs;   SB1194- 4 -LRB104 06167 BDA 16201 b1and other similar accessory or accompanying disposable 2foodware items used as part of food or beverage service or 3packaging.4    "Takeout food" means prepared food that is purchased to be 5consumed off the licensed premises of a food dispensing 6establishment. "Takeout food" includes, but is not limited to, 7prepared food carried out by a customer or delivered by a food 8dispensing establishment or a takeout food delivery service.9    "Takeout food delivery service" means a third-party 10delivery service that picks up takeout food from a food 11dispensing establishment and delivers it to a customer for 12consumption off of the licensed premises.13    (b) A full-service restaurant or quick-service restaurant 14shall not provide single-use plastic disposable foodware items 15to a consumer ordering or purchasing dine-in food unless 16requested by the consumer. Plastic drinking straws must be 17provided when specifically requested.18    (c) Single-use plastic disposable foodware items provided 19when requested by customers may not be packaged in plastic.20    (d) A food dispensing establishment or takeout food 21delivery service must provide options for a customer to 22affirmatively request accessory disposable foodware items 23separate from the customer's order for a food or beverage 24across all ordering or point of sale platforms, including, but 25not limited to, the Internet, a smartphone application, other 26digital platforms, by telephone, and in person.  SB1194- 5 -LRB104 06167 BDA 16201 b1    (e) A full-service restaurant or quick-service restaurant 2offering condiments may use dispensers rather than prepackaged 3disposable condiment packets.4    (f) A full-service restaurant or quick-service restaurant 5must post a sign indicating that single-use plastic disposable 6foodware will be made available to the customer upon request 7or at a self serve station.8    (g) Nothing in this Section prohibits a full-service 9restaurant or quick-service restaurant from making single-use 10plastic straws available to customers ordering or purchasing 11dine-in food by making available cylinders, dispensers, 12containers, or any other means of allowing for single-use 13plastic straws to be obtained at the affirmative volition of 14the customer if a sign is posted encouraging the customer to 15reduce the use of single-use plastics.16    (h) The first violation of this Section shall result in a 17notice of violation, and any subsequent violation shall be 18punishable by a civil penalty of $25 for each day a 19full-service restaurant or quick-service restaurant is in 20violation of this Section. All civil penalties collected under 21this Section shall be paid to the Department. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 231, 2026.